Hawaii statutes.
§91-9 Contested cases; notice; hearing;
records. (a) Subject to section 91-8.5, in any contested case, all
parties shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing after reasonable notice.

(b) The notice shall include a statement of:

(1) The date, time, place, and nature of hearing;

(2) The legal authority under which the hearing is to
be held;

(3) The particular sections of the statutes and rules
involved;

(4) An explicit statement in plain language of the
issues involved and the facts alleged by the agency in support thereof;
provided that if the agency is unable to state such issues and facts in detail
at the time the notice is served, the initial notice may be limited to a
statement of the issues involved, and thereafter upon application a bill of particulars
shall be furnished;

(5) The fact that any party may retain counsel if the
party so desires and the fact that an individual may appear on the individual's
own behalf, or a member of a partnership may represent the partnership, or an
officer or authorized employee of a corporation or trust or association may
represent the corporation, trust, or association.

(c) Opportunities shall be afforded all
parties to present evidence and argument on all issues involved.

(d) Any procedure in a contested case may be
modified or waived by stipulation of the parties and informal disposition may
be made of any contested case by stipulation, agreed settlement, consent order,
or default.

(e) For the purpose of agency decisions, the
record shall include:

(1) All pleadings, motions, intermediate rulings;

(2) Evidence received or considered, including oral testimony, exhibits, and a statement of matters officially noticed;

(3) Offers of proof and rulings thereon;

(4) Proposed findings and exceptions;

(5) Report of the officer who presided at the
hearing;

(6) Staff memoranda submitted to members of the
agency in connection with their consideration of the case.

(f) It shall not be necessary to transcribe
the record unless requested for purposes of rehearing or court review.

(g) No matters outside the record shall be
considered by the agency in making its decision except as provided herein. [L
1961, c 103, §9; Supp, §6C-9; HRS §91-9; am L 1980, c 130, §1; gen ch 1985; am
L 2003, c 76, §2]

Case Notes

Provision for waiver
of any procedure includes procedural requirements of §91-11. 54 H. 10, 510
P.2d 358.

Subsection (c)
applied. 55 H. 538, 524 P.2d 84.

There were no
statutes which required that the prisoner be given a hearing on transfer from
state to federal prison. 58 H. 386, 570 P.2d 563.

Full hearing, what
constitutes. 60 H. 166, 590 P.2d 524.

State did not have to
follow contested case procedures in canceling a lease of state land. 66 H.
632, 672 P.2d 1030.

Particularized notice
of methodology used by public utilities commission in its ratemaking
determinations not required. 67 H. 425, 690 P.2d 274.

Where board of land
and natural resources improperly consulted outside sources, the violation was
cured by the subsequent rehearing proceeding. 76 H. 259, 874 P.2d 1084.

Appellant failed to
show that board of medical examiners violated subsection (g), where appellant
contended that board violated subsection (g) by taking testimony from hearings
officer during a hearing before the board en banc about matters not contained
in the record. 78 H. 21, 889 P.2d 705.

Receiving a letter
from party and taking a view of the premises after the public hearing was
closed were irregularities leading to reversal. 2 H. App. 43, 625 P.2d 1044.

Not violated by
agency's order that parties not make any further comments unless specifically
requested. 4 H. App. 633, 675 P.2d 784.

Cited: 904 F. Supp.
1098.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next